vi: Phần cứng > Vật liệu xây dựng > Đồ kim loại cho cửa: Chuông cửa; Bộ đóng cửa chậm; Khung cửa; Nắp lỗ khóa; Quả đấm & Tay nắm cửa; Búa gõ cửa; Tấm đệm đẩy cửa; Cái chặn cửa; Chốt cửa
ro-RO: Feronerie > Materiale de construcții > Feronerie pentru uși: Sonerii și clopoței pentru ușă; Închizători de uși; Tocuri de uși; Șilduri pentru gaura cheii; Clanțe și mânere pentru uși; Inele metalice pentru uși; Plăci „împinge” pentru uși; Opritoare pentru uși; Pene pentru deschizătoare de uși
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Gradbeni materiali > Okovje za vrata: Hišni zvonci in melodije; Zapirala za vrata; Okvirji za vrata; Pokrovčki za vratne ključavnice; Vratne kljuke in ročaji; Trkala za vrata; Plošče za potiskanje vrat; Omejevalniki odpiranja vrat; Zapahi za vrata
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Строительные изделия > Дверная фурнитура: Дверные звонки; Доводчики; Дверные коробки; Накладки на дверные замки; Дверные ручки; Дверные молотки; Отбойные пластины для дверей; Дверные упоры; Ответные планки
tr: Hırdavat > Yapı Malzemeleri > Kapı Hırdavatları: Kapı Zil ve Çanları; Kapı Kapatıcılar; Kapı Kasaları; Kapı Anahtar Deliği Kapakları; Kapı Topuz ve Kolları; Kapı Tokmakları; Kapı İtme Levhaları; Kapı Tamponları; Kapı Kilitleri
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Stavební materiály > Kování dveří: Domovní zvonky; Zavírače dveří; Dveřní rámy; Ozdobné štítky klíčových dírek; Dveřní kliky, koule a madla; Klepadla; Ochranné desky na dveře; Dveřní zarážky; Zamykání dveří
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Statybinės medžiagos > Durų furnitūra: Durų varpai ir varpeliai; Durų pritraukikliai; Durų staktos; Durų rakto skylutės dangteliai; Durų rankenos ir rankenėlės; Durų belstukai; Durų rankenų plokštelės; Durų stabdikliai; Durų priešspyniai
sk-SK: Náradie > Stavebné materiály > Kovanie dverí: Zvončeky a zvonkohry v dome; Dverové zatvárače; Rámy dverí; Kryty rámu kľúčovej dierky; Kľučky na dverách; Dverové klepadlá; Prítlačné panely na dverách; Zarážky dverí; Dverové zámky
bg-BG: Железария > Строителни материали > Обков за врати: Звънци и камбани за врати; Панти за автоматично затваряне на врата; Каси за врати; Розетки за ключалки; Дръжки и топки за врати; Чукалки за врати; Плочи за бутащи се врати; Стопове за врати; Насрещници за врати
nb: Maskinvare > Bygningsmaterialer > Maskinvare for dører: Dørbjeller og ringeklokker; Dørlukkere; Dørrammer; Dørnøkkelplater; Dørhåndtak og -vridere; Dørbankere; Skyveplater for dører; Dørstoppere; Dørbeskyttere
fr: Quincaillerie > Matériaux de construction > Quincaillerie pour portes: Sonnettes et carillons; Ferme-porte; Encadrements de porte; Entrées de serrure; Boutons et poignées de porte; Heurtoirs de porte; Plaques de porte; Butoirs de porte; Gâches électriques
pt-PT: Equipamento > Materiais de construção > Equipamento de portas: Sinos e campainhas de porta; Fechos de porta; Estruturas de porta; Espelhos de fechadura; Pegas e puxadores de porta; Aldrabas; Pegas para puxar portas; Batentes de porta; Fechaduras
es: Bricolaje > Materiales de construcción > Artículos para puertas: Timbres; Cierrapuertas; Marcos de puertas; Escudos para cerraduras de puertas; Picaportes y manijas para puertas; Llamadores; Manijas para puertas; Topes; Cerraduras eléctricas
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Materiali da costruzione > Componenti per porte: Campanelli per porte; Chiudiporte; Telai per porte; Bocchette per serrature; Maniglie per porte e maniglie; Batacchi; Piastre per spinta porte; Fermaporta; Serrature
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Baumaterialien > Türbeschläge & -klingeln: Türklingeln; Türschließer; Türrahmen; Schlüssellochverzierungen für Türen; Türknäufe & -klinken; Türklopfer; Türdruckplatten; Türstopper; Schlossfallen
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Οικοδομικά υλικά > Εξοπλισμός πόρτας: Κουδούνια & καμπάνες πόρτας; Διατάξεις για κλείσιμο πόρτας; Πλαίσια πόρτας; Σχάρες κλειδαριάς πόρτας; Πόμολα & λαβές πόρτας; Ρόπτρα πορτών; Πλάκες ώθησης πόρτας; Στοπ πόρτας; Συρτοδόχοι πόρτας
pt-BR: Ferragens > Materiais de construção > Acessórios para portas: Campainhas da porta; Portas automáticas; Estruturas de portas; Fechaduras decorativas para portas; Maçanetas e puxadores; Aldravas; Protetores para maçanetas e puxadores; Batentes de portas; Desarmadores elétricos
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 建材 > 门用五金: 门铃; 闭门器; 门框; 门锁孔盖; 门把手/门拉手; 门环; 门推板; 门挡; 阴极锁/阳极锁
ko: 철물 > 건축 자재 > 문 철물 부속품: 도어 벨/차임; 도어 체크; 문틀; 문 열쇠구멍 장식쇠; 문 손잡이; 현관 노커; 도어 푸시 플레이트; 문버팀쇠; 도어 스트라이크
pl: Sprzęt > Materiały budowlane > Wyposażenie do drzwi: Dzwonki i gongi do drzwi; Automaty do zamykania drzwi; Ościeżnice; Szyldy do zamków; Gałki i klamki do drzwi; Kołatki do drzwi; Powierzchnie dotykowe na drzwi; Odboje drzwiowe; Zaczepy do drzwi
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > วัสดุก่อสร้าง > ฮาร์ดแวร์สำหรับประตู: กริ่งประตู; โช๊คประตู; กรอบประตู; แผ่นโลหะบังรูกุญแจประตู; ลูกบิดและที่จับประตู; ที่เคาะประตู; แผ่นป้องกันประตู; ที่กั้นประตู; ร่องกลอนประตู
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Afbouwmaterialen > Deurbeslag: Deurbellen; Deurdrangers; Deurkozijnen; Sleutelgatplaatjes voor deuren; Deurknoppen en -krukken; Deurkloppers; Duwplaten voor deuren; Deurstops; Deurplaten
fi: Rakentaminen > Rakennusmateriaalit > Oven metalliosat: Ovikellot; Ovipumput; Ovenkarmit; Avaimenreiän suojukset; Ovenkahvat; Ovenkolkuttimet; Oven työntölevyt; Ovenpysäyttimet; Lukkorungot
en: Hardware > Building Materials > Door Hardware: Door Bells & Chimes; Door Closers; Door Frames; Door Keyhole Escutcheons; Door Knobs & Handles; Door Knockers; Door Push Plates; Door Stops; Door Strikes
hu: Hardver > Építőanyagok > Ajtóhardver: Ajtócsengők és harangok; Ajtózárók; Ajtókeretek; Ajtókulcslyuk-védőburkolatok; Ajtókilincsek és fogantyúk; Ajtókopogtatók; Ajtótolólapok; Ajtómegállítók; Ajtóütközők
sv: Metallprodukter > Byggnadsmaterial > Dörrtillbehör: Dörrklockor och ringklockor; Dörrstängare; Dörrkarmar; Nyckelbeslag; Dörrkläppar; Portklappar; Dörrplattor; Dörrstopp; Slutbleck
ja: DIY用品 > 建築材料 > ドア用品・取付金具: ドアチャイム; ドアクローザー; ドア枠; ドア用鍵穴装飾プレート; ドアノブ・ドアレバー; ドアノッカー; ドア押板; ドアストッパー; ドアストライク
hr-HR: Željezarija > Građevinski materijali > Metalni dijelovi za vrata: Zvona i zvonca za vrata; Zatvarači za vrata; Okviri vrata; Zaštitne pločice za ključanice; Kvake i ručke za vrata; Zvekiri za vrata; Ploče za guranje vrata; Zaustavljači za vrata; Prihvatnici za brave
zh-TW: 硬體 > 建材 > 門用五金: 門鈴; 自動關門器; 門框; 鎖孔蓋; 門把; 門環; 門推板; 門擋; 門扣
da: Isenkram > Byggematerialer > Dørtilbehør: Dørklokker; Dørlukkere; Dørkarme; Nøglehulsbeslag; Dørgreb og -håndtag; Dørbankere; Trykplader til døråbning; Dørstoppere; Slutblik